apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 32824
	Sdefs: 92
	Paradigms: 58

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÛÜÚàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="alpha" /> 
		<sdef n="acc" /> 
		<sdef n="nomiacc" /> 
		<sdef n="nom" /> 
		<sdef n="comp" /> 
		<sdef n="detnt" /> 
		<sdef n="predet" /> 
		<sdef n="past" /> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="qnt" /> 
		<sdef n="ord" /> 
		<sdef n="obj" /> 
		<sdef n="subj" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="acr" /> 
		<sdef n="top" /> 
		<sdef n="ant" /> 
		<sdef n="cog" /> 
		<sdef n="al" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="preadv" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rel" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="an" /> 
		<sdef n="aa" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="itg" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="dem" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="vaux" /> 
		<sdef n="vbser" /> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="gerpast" /> 
		<sdef n="pp" /> 
		<sdef n="pp2" /> 
		<sdef n="pp3" /> 
		<sdef n="pri" /> 
		<sdef n="ifi" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pii" /> 
		<sdef n="fti" /> 
		<sdef n="fts" /> 
		<sdef n="cni" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="pis" /> 
		<sdef n="imp" /> 
		<sdef n="pos" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="ref" /> 
		<sdef n="sup" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="percent" /> 
		<sdef n="ij" /> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
		<sdef n="cm" /> 
		<sdef n="lpar" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="web" /> 
		<sdef n="subs" /> 
		<sdef n="pres" /> 
		<sdef n="pprs" /> 
		<sdef n="guio" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="vbdo" /> 
		<sdef n="sint" /> 
		<sdef n="unc" /> 
		<sdef n="sep" /> 
		<sdef n="pron" /> 
		<sdef n="apos" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

<!-- Formatting of this dix:
     apertium-dixtools cat -stripEmptyLines -align -alignpardef 30 60 apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml nova.xml
-->



<pardef n="nomacc0">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="proper_names">
<e>                           <re>(St|s\-ro|s\-ino|f\-ino|d\-ro|Sir|Lord|Rt Hon|Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr).? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>

                           <!--	<re>(s\-ro|s\-ino|d\-ro|Sir|Lord|Rt Hon|Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr).? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re> -->

          <!-- damn, doesent work :-( ????
      <e>
	<p><l>f\-inon<b/></l><r>f\-ino<b/></r></p><re>([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      -->
</pardef>


<pardef n="DNA__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<!--
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
-->
</pardef>




<pardef n="BBC__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="acronimos">
<!--  TODO FIX! -->
<e>                           <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e r="RL">                    <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>

</pardef>




<pardef n="Ifans__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ouml">
<e>                           <p><l>ö</l>                   <r>ö</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>oe</l>                  <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="uuml">
<e>                           <p><l>ü</l>                   <r>ü</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ue</l>                  <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ordinals">
<e>                           <re>([0-9]+)?</re><p><l>a</l> <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="time">
<e>                           <re>[0-9]+[.:][0-5][0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="adiós__ij">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- handle cx, etc. -->
<pardef n="ĉ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>cx</l>                  <r>ĉ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ĉ</l>                   <r>ĉ</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ĝ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>gx</l>                  <r>ĝ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ĝ</l>                   <r>ĝ</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="saluton">              <i>saluton</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis poste">            <par n="ĝ"/><i>is<b/>poste</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis revido">           <par n="ĝ"/><i>is<b/>revido</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bonan matenon">        <i>bonan<b/>matenon</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ambaŭ">                <i>amba</i><par n="ŭ"/><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<e lm="ĉelo">                 <par n="ĉ"/><i>elo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="malriĉeco">            <i>malri</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>eco</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="">                     <i>birdo<b/>en<b/>mano<b/>valoras<b/>du<b/>en<b/>arbusto</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="">                     <i>la<b/>foresto<b/>pli<b/>amigas<b/>la<b/>koron</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="">                     <i>ne<b/>ĉio<b/>kiu<b/>brilas<b/>estas<b/>oro</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kadukiĝo">             <i>kaduki</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e lm="fendiĝinta">           <i>fendi</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>int</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="senkondiĉe">           <i>senkondi</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>e</i><par n="komence__adv"/></e>
<e lm="deflankiĝo">           <i>deflanki</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="senĝena">              <i>sen</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>en</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiĉerono">             <par n="ĉ"/><i>i</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>erono</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="montriĝi">             <i>montri</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cm">                   <i>cm</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="mm">                   <i>mm</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="elaĉeto">              <i>ela</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>eto</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="restaŭriĝi">           <i>resta</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>ri</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="BBC">                  <i>BBC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="DNA">                  <i>DNA</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="IBM">                  <i>IBM</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="NATO">                 <i>NATO</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="UEFA">                 <i>UEFA</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="US">                   <i>US</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="UK">                   <i>UK</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="EU">                   <i>EU</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e>                           <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="acronimos"/></e>
<e lm="AVI">                  <i>AVI</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="Aidoso">               <i>Aidoso</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e>                           <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen">               <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen Trumpf">        <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">            <i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tönis">                <i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Randerson">            <i>Randerson</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Palmer">               <i>Palmer</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edwards">              <i>Edwards</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Walker">               <i>Walker</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Duncan">               <i>Duncan</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kelly">                <i>Kelly</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Taylor">               <i>Taylor</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Black">                <i>Black</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="ĉikani">               <par n="ĉ"/><i>ikan</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enŝuldiĝo">            <i>en</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>uldi</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="neplaĉa">              <i>nepla</i><par n="ĉ"/><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="proper_names"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="time"/></e>
